Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.699

Schools of medicine—Underrepresented students—Report.

(1) Within existing resources, by January 1, 2022, the school of medicine at the University of Washington, established under chapter 28B.20 RCW, and the school of medicine at Washington State University, established under chapter 28B.30 RCW, shall each develop a goal focused on increasing the number of underrepresented students at each school of medicine, guided by the state of Washington's need for physicians from diverse racial and ethnic backgrounds and each school's predominant equity goals. In developing the goal, special consideration may be given to students attending the school of medicine at the University of Washington as a part of a regional partnership with other states. Each initial goal shall be set for January 1, 2025.

(2) The school of medicine at the University of Washington and the school of medicine at Washington State University shall report progress towards their goal on an annual basis through their public websites.

[ 2021 c 96 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—2021 c 96: See note following RCW 28B.10.698.